Vermont, session 2025-2026, H310.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. FINDINGS AND INTENT
(a) Intent.
(1) To avoid the proliferation of antisemetic curricula, professional
development trainings, and classroom culture in the Vermont education
system, it is the intent of the General Assembly that Vermont establish a
curriculum around the evolving nature of antisemitism and how it should be
taught to educators, administrators, and students.
(2) It is the further intent of the General Assembly that Vermont
establish antisemitism prevention training in Vermont schools.
(b) Findings.
(1) In 2023, according to the Anti-Defamation League, Vermont saw the
second-highest increase in antisemitic hate crimes per capita in the nation.
(2) Also according to the Anti-Defamation League, between October 7,
2023 and September 24, 2024, America saw a 200 percent increase in
antisemitic hate crimes nationwide.
VT LEG #379559 v.3

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.310
2025 Page 3 of 6
(3) According to the FBI, the United States saw 1,832 anti-Jewish hate
crimes in 2023, up from 1,122 in 2022.
(4) Vermont currently lacks curricula and training for both students and
educators to prevent the normalization of antisemitism in Vermont.
Sec. 2. 16 V.S.A. § 11 is amended to read:
§ 11. CLASSIFICATIONS AND DEFINITIONS
(a) As used in this title, unless the context otherwise clearly requires:
* * *
(26)(A) “Harassment” means an incident or incidents of verbal, written,
visual, or physical conduct, including any incident conducted by electronic
means, based on or motivated by a student’s or a student’s family member’s
actual or perceived race, religion, ethnicity, creed, color, national origin,
marital status, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, or disability that has the
purpose or effect of objectively and substantially undermining and detracting
from or interfering with a student’s educational performance or access to
school resources or creating an objectively intimidating, hostile, or offensive
environment.
(B) “Harassment” includes conduct that violates subdivision (A) of
this subdivision (26) and constitutes one or more of the following:
(i) Sexual harassment, which means conduct that includes
unwelcome sexual advances, requests for sexual favors and other verbal,
VT LEG #379559 v.3

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.310
2025 Page 4 of 6
written, visual, or physical conduct of a sexual nature when one or both of the
following occur:
(I) Submission to that conduct is made either explicitly or
implicitly a term or condition of a student’s education.
(II) Submission to or rejection of such conduct by a student is
used as a component of the basis for decisions affecting that student.
(ii) Racial harassment, which means conduct directed at the
characteristics of a student’s or a student’s family member’s actual or
perceived race or color, and includes the use of epithets, stereotypes, racial
slurs, comments, insults, derogatory remarks, gestures, threats, graffiti, display,
or circulation of written or visual material, and taunts on manner of speech and
negative references to racial customs.
(iii) Ethnic harassment, which means conduct directed at the
characteristics of a student’s or a student’s family member’s actual or
perceived ethnicity, and includes the use of epithets, stereotypes, ethnic slurs,
comments, insults, derogatory remarks, gestures, threats, graffiti, display, or
circulation of written or visual material, and taunts on manner of speech and
negative references to ethnic customs.
(iv) Antisemitic harassment, which means conduct directed at the
characteristics of a student’s or a student’s family member’s actual or
perceived Jewish heritage, and includes the use of epithets, stereotypes,
VT LEG #379559 v.3

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.310
2025 Page 5 of 6
antisemitic slurs, antisemitic libel, comments, insults, derogatory remarks,
gestures, threats, graffiti, display, or circulation of written or visual material,
taunts on manner of speech, and negative references to Jewish customs or the
right to self-determination in the Jewish people’s ancestral and indigenous
homeland.
(v) Harassment of members of other protected categories, which
means conduct directed at the characteristics of a student’s or a student’s
family member’s actual or perceived creed, national origin, marital status, sex,
sexual orientation, gender identity, or disability and includes the use of
epithets, stereotypes, slurs, comments, insults, derogatory remarks, gestures,
threats, graffiti, display, or circulation of written or visual material, taunts on
manner of speech, and negative references to customs related to any of these
protected categories.
* * *
Sec. 3. 16 V.S.A. § 914 is added to read:
§ 914. ANTISEMITISM AWARENESS EDUCATION CURRICULUM
(a) The Secretary, in conjunction with Shalom Alliance of Vermont, where
appropriate, shall develop a sequential antisemitism awareness education
curriculum for elementary and secondary schools. The curriculum shall
include teaching about the evolution, effects, ethics, and legal consequences of
antisemitism in Vermont, the United States, and abroad.
VT LEG #379559 v.3

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.310
2025 Page 6 of 6
(b) The Secretary shall:
(1) Provide for pre-service and in-service training programs for school
personnel on antisemitism prevention and on the forms, effects, and legal
consequences of antisemitism. At least one training program shall be made
available in electronic format. Each superintendent shall determine the
content, duration, and frequency of training on issues concerning antisemitism
education for the districts in the superintendent’s supervisory union.
(2) Provide teaching materials that are appropriate to the age and
learning ability of the students.
(3) Provide technical assistance to local school districts for
implementation of the curriculum.
(4) Encourage coordination of effort with existing community resources.
Sec. 4. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on passage.
VT LEG #379559 v.3